Washington statutes.
RCW 38.32.100

Buying and receiving military property.

Any person who shall purchase or receive in pawn or pledge any military property of the state or of the United States shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars or imprisoned for not more than six months or both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 1943 c 130 s 87; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-87. Cf. 1917 c 107 s 68.]